District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-2212

Applicability.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-289, § 13, 57 DCR 11499
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7008, 61 DCR 9990

Cross References

Surveyor of the District of Columbia, duties, see § 1-1301 et seq.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of section, see § 7008 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of section, see § 7008 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 7008 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).